Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.226

Community-based sealant programs in schools.

(1) For low-income, rural, and other at-risk populations and in coordination with local public health jurisdictions and local oral health coalitions, a dental assistant working as of April 19, 2001, under the supervision of a licensed dentist may apply sealants and fluoride varnishes under the general supervision of a dentist in community-based sealant programs carried out in schools without attending the department's school sealant endorsement program.

(2) For low-income, rural, and other at-risk populations and in coordination with local public health jurisdictions and local oral health coalitions, dental assistants who are school sealant endorsed under RCW 43.70.650 may apply sealants and fluoride varnishes under the general supervision of a dentist in community-based sealant programs carried out in schools.

[ 2001 c 93 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2001 c 93: See notes following RCW 43.70.650.